Utah statutes.
17-21-14.   Military records -- Evidence.

(1)  Upon presentation, the county recorder shall:

(a)  record, free of charge, discharges from the military, naval, or marine service of the United States, and any and all orders, citations, and decorations of honor relating to a person while the person was in the military, naval, or marine service of the United States; and

(b)  furnish, free of charge, certified copies of any of those records to the person to whom they relate and to the father, mother, brothers, sisters, or any lineal descendant of that person.

(2)  Those certified copies may be read in evidence with the same effect as the original in any action or proceeding before any court, commission, or other tribunal in this state.



Amended by Chapter 85, 1999 General Session

